Illinois, session 104th, SB4001.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-21.9 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-21.9)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-21.9)7    Sec. 10-21.9. Criminal history records checks and checks 8of the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 9and Violent Offender Against Youth Database.10    (a) Licensed and nonlicensed applicants for employment 11with a school district, except school bus driver applicants, 12are required as a condition of employment to authorize a 13fingerprint-based criminal history records check to determine 14if such applicants have been convicted of any disqualifying, 15enumerated criminal or drug offenses in subsection (c) of this 16Section or have been convicted, within 7 years of the 17application for employment with the school district, of any 18other felony under the laws of this State or of any offense 19committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws 20of the United States that, if committed or attempted in this 21State, would have been punishable as a felony under the laws of 22this State. Authorization for the check shall be furnished by 23the applicant to the school district, except that if the   SB4001- 2 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1applicant is a substitute teacher seeking employment in more 2than one school district, a teacher seeking concurrent 3part-time employment positions with more than one school 4district (as a reading specialist, special education teacher 5or otherwise), or an educational support personnel employee 6seeking employment positions with more than one district, any 7such district may require the applicant to furnish 8authorization for the check to the regional superintendent of 9the educational service region in which are located the school 10districts in which the applicant is seeking employment as a 11substitute or concurrent part-time teacher or concurrent 12educational support personnel employee. Upon receipt of this 13authorization, the school district or the appropriate regional 14superintendent, as the case may be, shall submit the 15applicant's name, sex, race, date of birth, social security 16number, fingerprint images, and other identifiers, as 17prescribed by the Illinois State Police, to the Illinois State 18Police. The regional superintendent submitting the requisite 19information to the Illinois State Police shall promptly notify 20the school districts in which the applicant is seeking 21employment as a substitute or concurrent part-time teacher or 22concurrent educational support personnel employee that the 23check of the applicant has been requested. The Illinois State 24Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall furnish, 25pursuant to a fingerprint-based criminal history records 26check, records of convictions, forever and hereinafter, until   SB4001- 3 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1expunged, to the president of the school board for the school 2district that requested the check, or to the regional 3superintendent who requested the check. The Illinois State 4Police shall charge the school district or the appropriate 5regional superintendent a fee for conducting such check, which 6fee shall be deposited in the State Police Services Fund and 7shall not exceed the cost of the inquiry; and the applicant 8shall not be charged a fee for such check by the school 9district or by the regional superintendent, except that those 10applicants seeking employment as a substitute teacher with a 11school district may be charged a fee not to exceed the cost of 12the inquiry. Subject to appropriations for these purposes, the 13State Superintendent of Education shall reimburse school 14districts and regional superintendents for fees paid to obtain 15criminal history records checks under this Section.16    (a-5) The school district or regional superintendent shall 17further perform a check of the Statewide Sex Offender 18Database, as authorized by the Sex Offender Community 19Notification Law, for each applicant. The check of the 20Statewide Sex Offender Database must be conducted by the 21school district or regional superintendent once for every 5 22years that an applicant remains employed by the school 23district. 24    (a-6) The school district or regional superintendent shall 25further perform a check of the Statewide Murderer and Violent 26Offender Against Youth Database, as authorized by the Murderer   SB4001- 4 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1and Violent Offender Against Youth Community Notification Law, 2for each applicant. The check of the Murderer and Violent 3Offender Against Youth Database must be conducted by the 4school district or regional superintendent once for every 5 5years that an applicant remains employed by the school 6district. 7    (b) Any information concerning the record of convictions 8obtained by the president of the school board or the regional 9superintendent shall be confidential and may only be 10transmitted to the superintendent of the school district or 11his designee, the appropriate regional superintendent if the 12check was requested by the school district, the presidents of 13the appropriate school boards if the check was requested from 14the Illinois State Police by the regional superintendent, the 15State Board of Education and a school district as authorized 16under subsection (b-5), the State Superintendent of Education, 17the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, any other 18person necessary to the decision of hiring the applicant for 19employment, or for clarification purposes the Illinois State 20Police or Statewide Sex Offender Database, or both. A copy of 21the record of convictions obtained from the Illinois State 22Police shall be provided to the applicant for employment. Upon 23the check of the Statewide Sex Offender Database or Statewide 24Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Database, the 25school district or regional superintendent shall notify an 26applicant as to whether or not the applicant has been   SB4001- 5 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1identified in the Database. If a check of an applicant for 2employment as a substitute or concurrent part-time teacher or 3concurrent educational support personnel employee in more than 4one school district was requested by the regional 5superintendent, and the Illinois State Police upon a check 6ascertains that the applicant has not been convicted of any of 7the enumerated criminal or drug offenses in subsection (c) of 8this Section or has not been convicted, within 7 years of the 9application for employment with the school district, of any 10other felony under the laws of this State or of any offense 11committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws 12of the United States that, if committed or attempted in this 13State, would have been punishable as a felony under the laws of 14this State and so notifies the regional superintendent and if 15the regional superintendent upon a check ascertains that the 16applicant has not been identified in the Sex Offender Database 17or Statewide Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth 18Database, then the regional superintendent shall issue to the 19applicant a certificate evidencing that as of the date 20specified by the Illinois State Police the applicant has not 21been convicted of any of the enumerated criminal or drug 22offenses in subsection (c) of this Section or has not been 23convicted, within 7 years of the application for employment 24with the school district, of any other felony under the laws of 25this State or of any offense committed or attempted in any 26other state or against the laws of the United States that, if   SB4001- 6 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1committed or attempted in this State, would have been 2punishable as a felony under the laws of this State and 3evidencing that as of the date that the regional 4superintendent conducted a check of the Statewide Sex Offender 5Database or Statewide Murderer and Violent Offender Against 6Youth Database, the applicant has not been identified in the 7Database. The school board of any school district may rely on 8the certificate issued by any regional superintendent to that 9substitute teacher, concurrent part-time teacher, or 10concurrent educational support personnel employee or may 11initiate its own criminal history records check of the 12applicant through the Illinois State Police and its own check 13of the Statewide Sex Offender Database or Statewide Murderer 14and Violent Offender Against Youth Database as provided in 15this Section. Any unauthorized release of confidential 16information may be a violation of Section 7 of the Criminal 17Identification Act.18    (b-5) If a criminal history records check or check of the 19Statewide Sex Offender Database or Statewide Murderer and 20Violent Offender Against Youth Database is performed by a 21regional superintendent for an applicant seeking employment as 22a substitute teacher with a school district, the regional 23superintendent may disclose to the State Board of Education 24whether the applicant has been issued a certificate under 25subsection (b) based on those checks. If the State Board 26receives information on an applicant under this subsection,   SB4001- 7 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1then it must indicate in the Educator Licensure Information 2System for a 90-day period that the applicant has been issued 3or has not been issued a certificate. 4    (c) No school board shall knowingly employ a person who 5has been convicted of any offense that would subject him or her 6to license suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 21B-80 7of this Code, except as provided under subsection (b) of 8Section 21B-80. Further, no school board shall knowingly 9employ a person who has been found to be the perpetrator of 10sexual or physical abuse of any minor under 18 years of age 11pursuant to proceedings under Article II of the Juvenile Court 12Act of 1987. As a condition of employment, each school board 13must consider the status of a person who has been issued an 14indicated finding of abuse or neglect of a child by the 15Department of Children and Family Services under the Abused 16and Neglected Child Reporting Act or by a child welfare agency 17of another jurisdiction. 18    (d) No school board shall knowingly employ a person for 19whom a criminal history records check and a Statewide Sex 20Offender Database check have not been initiated.21    (e) Within 10 days after a superintendent, regional office 22of education, or entity that provides background checks of 23license holders to public schools receives information of a 24pending criminal charge against a license holder for an 25offense set forth in Section 21B-80 of this Code, the 26superintendent, regional office of education, or entity must   SB4001- 8 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1notify the State Superintendent of Education of the pending 2criminal charge. 3    If permissible by federal or State law, no later than 15 4business days after receipt of a record of conviction or of 5checking the Statewide Murderer and Violent Offender Against 6Youth Database or the Statewide Sex Offender Database and 7finding a registration, the superintendent of the employing 8school board or the applicable regional superintendent shall, 9in writing, notify the State Superintendent of Education of 10any license holder who has been convicted of a crime set forth 11in Section 21B-80 of this Code. Upon receipt of the record of a 12conviction of or a finding of child abuse by a holder of any 13license issued pursuant to Article 21B or Section 34-8.1 of 14this Code, the State Superintendent of Education may initiate 15licensure suspension and revocation proceedings as authorized 16by law. If the receipt of the record of conviction or finding 17of child abuse is received within 6 months after the initial 18grant of or renewal of a license, the State Superintendent of 19Education may rescind the license holder's license. 20    (e-5) The superintendent of the employing school board 21shall, in writing, notify the State Superintendent of 22Education and the applicable regional superintendent of 23schools of any license holder whom he or she has reasonable 24cause to believe has committed (i) an intentional act of abuse 25or neglect with the result of making a child an abused child or 26a neglected child, as defined in Section 3 of the Abused and   SB4001- 9 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1Neglected Child Reporting Act, or (ii) an act of sexual 2misconduct, as defined in Section 22-85.5 of this Code, and 3that act resulted in the license holder's dismissal or 4resignation from the school district. This notification must 5be submitted within 30 days after the dismissal or resignation 6and must include the Illinois Educator Identification Number 7(IEIN) of the license holder and a brief description of the 8misconduct alleged. The license holder must also be 9contemporaneously sent a copy of the notice by the 10superintendent. All correspondence, documentation, and other 11information so received by the regional superintendent of 12schools, the State Superintendent of Education, the State 13Board of Education, or the State Educator Preparation and 14Licensure Board under this subsection (e-5) is confidential 15and must not be disclosed to third parties, except (i) as 16necessary for the State Superintendent of Education or his or 17her designee to investigate and prosecute pursuant to Article 1821B of this Code, (ii) pursuant to a court order, (iii) for 19disclosure to the license holder or his or her representative, 20or (iv) as otherwise provided in this Article and provided 21that any such information admitted into evidence in a hearing 22is exempt from this confidentiality and non-disclosure 23requirement. Except for an act of willful or wanton 24misconduct, any superintendent who provides notification as 25required in this subsection (e-5) shall have immunity from any 26liability, whether civil or criminal or that otherwise might   SB4001- 10 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1result by reason of such action.2    (f) After January 1, 1990 the provisions of this Section 3shall apply to all employees of persons or firms holding 4contracts with any school district including, but not limited 5to, food service workers, school bus drivers and other 6transportation employees, who have direct, daily contact with 7the pupils of any school in such district. For purposes of 8criminal history records checks and checks of the Statewide 9Sex Offender Database on employees of persons or firms holding 10contracts with more than one school district and assigned to 11more than one school district, the regional superintendent of 12the educational service region in which the contracting school 13districts are located may, at the request of any such school 14district, be responsible for receiving the authorization for a 15criminal history records check prepared by each such employee 16and submitting the same to the Illinois State Police and for 17conducting a check of the Statewide Sex Offender Database for 18each employee. Any information concerning the record of 19conviction and identification as a sex offender of any such 20employee obtained by the regional superintendent shall be 21promptly reported to the president of the appropriate school 22board or school boards.23    (f-5) Upon request of a school or school district, any 24information obtained by a school district pursuant to 25subsection (f) of this Section within the last year must be 26made available to the requesting school or school district.  SB4001- 11 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1    (g) Prior to the commencement of any student teaching 2experience or required internship (which is referred to as 3student teaching in this Section) in the public schools, a 4student teacher is required to authorize a fingerprint-based 5criminal history records check. Authorization for and payment 6of the costs of the check must be furnished by the student 7teacher to the school district where the student teaching is 8to be completed. Upon receipt of this authorization and 9payment, the school district shall submit the student 10teacher's name, sex, race, date of birth, social security 11number, fingerprint images, and other identifiers, as 12prescribed by the Illinois State Police, to the Illinois State 13Police. The Illinois State Police and the Federal Bureau of 14Investigation shall furnish, pursuant to a fingerprint-based 15criminal history records check, records of convictions, 16forever and hereinafter, until expunged, to the president of 17the school board for the school district that requested the 18check. The Illinois State Police shall charge the school 19district a fee for conducting the check, which fee must not 20exceed the cost of the inquiry and must be deposited into the 21State Police Services Fund. The school district shall further 22perform a check of the Statewide Sex Offender Database, as 23authorized by the Sex Offender Community Notification Law, and 24of the Statewide Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth 25Database, as authorized by the Murderer and Violent Offender 26Against Youth Registration Act, for each student teacher. No   SB4001- 12 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1school board may knowingly allow a person to student teach for 2whom a criminal history records check, a Statewide Sex 3Offender Database check, and a Statewide Murderer and Violent 4Offender Against Youth Database check have not been completed 5and reviewed by the district.6    A copy of the record of convictions obtained from the 7Illinois State Police must be provided to the student teacher. 8Any information concerning the record of convictions obtained 9by the president of the school board is confidential and may 10only be transmitted to the superintendent of the school 11district or his or her designee, the State Superintendent of 12Education, the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 13or, for clarification purposes, the Illinois State Police or 14the Statewide Sex Offender Database or Statewide Murderer and 15Violent Offender Against Youth Database. Any unauthorized 16release of confidential information may be a violation of 17Section 7 of the Criminal Identification Act.18    No school board shall knowingly allow a person to student 19teach who has been convicted of any offense that would subject 20him or her to license suspension or revocation pursuant to 21subsection (c) of Section 21B-80 of this Code, except as 22provided under subsection (b) of Section 21B-80. Further, no 23school board shall allow a person to student teach if he or she 24has been found to be the perpetrator of sexual or physical 25abuse of a minor under 18 years of age pursuant to proceedings 26under Article II of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. Each school   SB4001- 13 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1board must consider the status of a person to student teach who 2has been issued an indicated finding of abuse or neglect of a 3child by the Department of Children and Family Services under 4the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act or by a child 5welfare agency of another jurisdiction. 6    (h) (Blank).7    (i) The Substitute Teacher Background Check Task Force is 8created to research and identify paths through legislation, 9rules, and communication processes to expedite the background 10check process and provide reciprocity concerning background 11checks for licensed substitute teachers in the State to teach 12in school districts across Regional Offices of Education 13jurisdictions without having to complete multiple background 14checks. The Task Force shall meet at the call of the State 15Superintendent of Education with the first meeting taking 16place on or before July 1, 2026. The State Superintendent of 17Education or his or her designee shall serve as the 18chairperson of the Task Force.19    The Task Force shall consist of the following members, 20appointed by the State Superintendent of Education:21        (1) one executive director representing an 22    intermediate service center;23        (2) one regional superintendent representing a 24    Regional Office of Education whose jurisdiction is 25    counties inside educational service area 1 but outside of 26    Cook County;  SB4001- 14 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1        (3) one regional superintendent representing a 2    Regional Office of Education inside educational service 3    area 2;4        (4) one regional superintendent representing a 5    Regional Office of Education inside educational service 6    area 3;7        (5) one regional superintendent representing a 8    Regional Office of Education inside educational service 9    area 4;10        (6) one regional superintendent representing a 11    Regional Office of Education inside educational service 12    area 5; and13        (7) one regional superintendent representing a 14    Regional Office of Education inside educational service 15    area 6.16    The State Board of Education shall provide administrative 17and other support for the Task Force. Members of the Task Force 18shall serve without compensation.19    The Task Force shall submit its findings in a report that 20shall include the following:21        (1) a detailed summary of the current State and 22    federal laws, rules, and systems that are currently 23    followed and used when Regional Offices of Education are 24    completing background checks on licensed substitute 25    teachers in the State;26        (2) potential changes in State law and rules that   SB4001- 15 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1    could be considered to expedite the process of background 2    checks on licensed substitute teachers;3        (3) potential changes in State law and rules that 4    could be considered to provide reciprocity for licensed 5    substitute teachers to teach in school districts across 6    Regional Offices of Education jurisdictions concerning 7    background checks;8        (4) potential communication processes that could be 9    implemented through State law and rules for Regional 10    Offices of Education to share background check information 11    between each other; and12        (5) potential barriers that current State and federal 13    law and rules impose on creating a more expedited system 14    for background checks on licensed substitute teachers and 15    on creating reciprocity for licensed substitute teachers 16    to work in school districts across Regional Offices of 17    Education jurisdictions concerning background checks.18    On or before October 31, 2026, the Task Force shall submit 19its report to the State Board of Education and the General 20Assembly. The Task Force is dissolved upon submission of its 21report.22    This subsection is inoperative on and after November 1, 232026. 24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-552, eff. 1-1-22; 25102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-894, eff. 265-20-22; 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   SB4001- 16 -LRB104 19616 LNS 33065 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.